Utah statutes.
34-40-105.   Grant of rulemaking authority.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commission may issue rules that are consistent with this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

